North Carolina statutes. Chapter 37A. Uniform Principal and Income Act.
Part 2A. Express Total Return Unitrusts.

§ 37A-1-104.21.
Definitions.

An “express total return unitrust” means a trust that has a governing instrument requiring the distribution at least annually of a unitrust amount equal to a fixed percentage of not less than three percent (3%) nor more than five percent (5%) per year of the net fair market value of the trust’s assets, valued at least annually.

“Code” means the Internal Revenue Code as described in

G.S. 37A-1-104

.1(1).

“Treasury regulations” means the treasury regulations described in

G.S. 37A-1-104

.1(9a).

History.

2005-244, s. 6.

§ 37A-1-104.22.
Determination of unitrust amount.

The unitrust amount to be distributed by the express total return unitrust may be determined in the governing instrument by reference to the net fair market value of the trust’s assets determined annually or averaged on a multiple year basis.

The terms of the governing instrument of an express total return unitrust may provide that:

Assets for which a fair market value cannot be readily ascertained shall be valued using valuation methods that the trustee considers reasonable and appropriate.

Assets, such as a residence property or tangible personal property, used by the trust beneficiary entitled to the unitrust amount may be excluded from the net fair market value for computing the unitrust amount.

History.

2005-244, s. 6.

§ 37A-1-104.23.
Effect of distribution of unitrust amount.

The distribution from an express total return unitrust of the fixed percentage of not less than three percent (3%) nor more than five percent (5%) reasonably apportions between the income beneficiaries and remaindermen the total return of an express total return unitrust.

History.

2005-244, s. 6.

§ 37A-1-104.24.
Change or conversion of unitrust amount.

The terms of the governing instrument of an express total return unitrust may provide the method similar to the method provided under

G.S. 37A-1-104

.2(a) for changing the unitrust percentage or for converting from a unitrust to an income trust or for a reconversion of an income trust to a unitrust, or for all of these actions.

If the terms of the governing instrument of an express total return unitrust do not specifically or by reference to

G.S. 37A-1-104

.2 grant a power to the trustee to change the unitrust percentage or change to an income trust, the trustee shall not have that power.

History.

2005-244, s. 6.

§ 37A-1-104.25.
Determination of character of unitrust amount.

Unless the terms of the governing instrument of the express total return unitrust specifically provide otherwise, the trustee:

Shall consider the unitrust amount as paid from net accounting income determined as if the trust were not a unitrust;

Shall then consider the unitrust amount as paid from ordinary income not allocable to net accounting income;

May, in the trustee’s discretion, consider the unitrust amount as paid from net short-term gain described in section 1222(5) of the Code and then from net long-term capital gain described in section 1222(7) of the Code so long as this discretionary power is exercised consistently and in a reasonable and impartial manner, but the amount so paid from net capital gains may not be greater than the excess of the unitrust amount over the amount of distributable net income as defined in section 643(a) of the Code without regard to section 1.643(a)-3(b) of the treasury regulations; and

Shall then consider the unitrust amount as coming from the principal of the trust.

History.

2005-244, s. 6.

§ 37A-1-104.26.
Unitrust amount in excess of a five percent payout.

A trust that provides for a fixed percentage payout in excess of five percent (5%) per year is considered an express total return unitrust that pays out a fixed percentage of five percent (5%) per year and pays out principal to the extent that the fixed percentage payout exceeds five percent (5%) per year.

History.

2005-244, s. 6.